Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2415
Public authority, defined.

Public authority shall mean the state, any county, any municipality or other municipal corporation, political subdivision, governmental unit, or public corporation created by or pursuant to the laws of this state, of another state, or of the United States, and any state or the United States, and any person, board, commission, district, authority, instrumentality, subdivision, or other body of any of the foregoing.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 15.